Massachusetts, session 194th, H4415.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Construction and development activity related to redevelopment by the
Boston Housing Authority of the Faneuil Gardens site owned by the Boston Housing Authority
between Faneuil Street and North Beacon Street, Boston Parcel ID 2202616000, in the city of
Boston and the adjacent parcel at the southeast corner of North Beacon Street and Goodenough
Street, Boston Parcel ID 2202627000, in the Brighton section of the City of Boston, an adjacent
parcel, or any part thereof, to create new publicly-assisted, affordable and mixed-income
housing, cultural space, replacement musician rehearsal space and complementary uses, shall not
be subject to any general or special law related to the procurement and award of contracts for the
planning, design, construction management, construction, reconstruction, installation,
demolition, maintenance or repair of buildings or public works by a public agency, including
Chapter 149, Chapter 7C, or Chapter 30, Section 39M of the General Laws, nor shall the
of 2

acquisition of any interest or disposition of any interest necessary to support the completion of
the project be subject to Chapter 30B, Section 16, but it shall be subject to Sections 26 to 27H,
inclusive, of Chapter 149 of the General Laws.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2